Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 7. Absentee Voting.
§ 24.2-707.
How ballots marked and returned.

On receipt of a mailed absentee ballot, the voter shall, in the presence of a witness, (i) open the sealed envelope marked “ballot within” and (ii) mark and refold the ballot, as provided in §§

24.2-644

and

24.2-646

without assistance and without making known how he marked the ballot, except as provided by §

24.2-704

.After the voter has marked his absentee ballot, he shall (a) enclose the ballot in the envelope provided for that purpose, (b) seal the envelope, (c) fill in and sign the statement printed on the back of the envelope in the presence of a witness, who shall sign the same envelope, (d) enclose the ballot envelope and any required assistance form within the envelope directed to the general registrar, and (e) seal that envelope. A voter’s failure to provide in the statement on the back of the envelope his full middle name or his middle initial shall not be a material omission, rendering his ballot void, unless the voter failed to provide in the statement on the back of the envelope his full first and last name. A voter’s failure to provide the date, or any part of the date, including the year, on which he signed the statement printed on the back of the envelope shall not be considered a material omission and shall not render his ballot void. A voter’s failure to have a witness sign the absentee ballot return envelope for any election held during a declared state of emergency related to a communicable disease of public health threat shall not be considered a material omission and shall not render his ballot void.

A mailed absentee ballot shall be returned (i) by mail to the office of the general registrar, (ii) by the voter in person to the general registrar, or (iii) to a drop-off location established pursuant to §

24.2-707.1

. For purposes of this subsection, “mail” includes a delivery by a commercial delivery service but does not include delivery by a personal courier service or other individual except as provided by §§

24.2-703.2

and

24.2-705

.

Failure to follow the procedures set forth in this section shall render the applicant’s ballot void.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-334, 24-337; 1956, c. 525; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-232; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 393; 1997, cc. 429, 450; 2001, cc. 617, 624; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2003, cc. 478, 1015; 2006, c. 438; 2014, cc. 453, 574, 575; 2015, cc. 313, 644, 645; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, c. 289; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 235, 471, 522.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669 rewrote parts of this section dealing with absentee voting in person as newly enacted §

24.2-701.1

. Acts 2019, c. 278, also amended this section, but since the text amended was rewritten as part of new §

24.2-701.1

, the amendment was given effect in § 24.2-701.1, as applicable to elections beginning with the 2020 general election, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 86.10, as added by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“A. 1. For the general election and special elections to be held November 3, 2020, upon receipt of an absentee ballot returned before October 31, 2020, each general registrar shall examine the ballot envelopes to verify completion of the required voter affirmation.

“2. If the general registrar finds during the examination of a returned absentee ballot envelope that the required voter affirmation was not correctly or completely filled out or that a procedure required by §

24.2-707

of the Code of Virginia was not properly followed, and such error or failure shall render the ballot void by law, the general registrar shall, within three days of such finding, notify the voter of the error or failure. However, notwithstanding the provisions of §§

24.2-706

and

24.2-707

of the Code of Virginia, the failure of an absentee voter marking and returning a mail absentee ballot for the November 3, 2020, general election, and any special election or ballot measure held on that date, to have a witness sign the statement on the back of the absentee ballot return envelope shall not be considered a material omission and shall not render his ballot void. Such notice shall be made by phone, email, or in writing and shall provide information to the voter as to how to correct the issue so his ballot may be counted. The voter shall be entitled to make such necessary corrections before noon on the third day after the election, and his ballot shall then be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in §

24.2-709.1

of the Code of Virginia if he is found to be entitled to vote. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no absentee ballot needing correction shall be delivered to the officers of election at the appropriate precinct until the voter is provided the opportunity to make the necessary corrections pursuant to this subparagraph.

“3. The general registrar may issue a new absentee ballot to the voter if necessary and shall preserve the first ballot with other spoiled ballots.

“B. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the general election and special elections to be held on November 3, 2020, mailed absentee ballots shall be returned (i) by mail to the office of the general registrar, (ii) by the voter in person to the general registrar, (iii) to a drop-off location, or (iv) by commercial delivery service.

“2. Mailed absentee ballots shall provide instructions that include information on the locations of all drop-off locations available in the locality at the time such ballots are mailed by the general registrar.

“3. The general registrar of each county or city shall establish at the office of the general registrar and each voter satellite office in operation for an election a drop-off location for the purpose of allowing voters to deposit completed absentee ballots for such election. On the day of the election, there shall also be a drop-off location at each polling place in operation for the election. The general registrar may establish additional drop-off locations within the county or city as he deems necessary. All drop-off locations shall be accessible; be on public property, unless located at a polling place; and otherwise comply with any criteria for drop-off locations set by the Department of Elections.

“4. The Department of Elections shall set standards for the establishment and operation of drop-off locations, including necessary security requirements. The Department of Elections shall submit such standards to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the House Committee on Appropriations within 30 days of the effective date of this act [September 4, 2020].

“5. The general registrar of a county or city utilizing drop-off locations shall post notice of the locations of the drop-off locations in the locality in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city. Such notice shall remain in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city for the duration of the period during which absentee ballots may be returned.

“6. Absentee ballots shall be collected from drop-off locations in accordance with the instructions provided by the Department of Elections. Such instructions shall include chain of custody requirements and recordkeeping requirements. Absentee ballots shall be collected at least daily, by two officers of election representing the two major political parties, when practicable, or by two employees from the office of the general registrar, unless the drop-off location is in the office of the general registrar, in which case the general registrar or an assistant general registrar may collect the absentee ballots.

“7. Any ballot returned to a drop-off location in any manner except as prescribed by law shall be void. Absentee ballots shall be returned to a drop-off location before the closing of the polls. Any voter who is in line to return the voter’s absentee ballot at a drop-off location by 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election shall be permitted to deposit the absentee ballot.

“C. 1. The general registrar shall include with the absentee ballot prescribed in §

24.2-706

of the Code of Virginia, an envelope, properly addressed and postage prepaid, for the return of the ballot to the general registrar by mail for the general election and special elections held on November 3, 2020.

“2. Included in this appropriation is up to $2,000,000 the first year from the general fund to reimburse localities for the cost of prepaid postage required in subparagraph C.1. of this Item. This amount shall remain unallotted until the Department of Elections provides documentation of qualifying amounts to be reimbursed to localities for prepaid postage of return absentee ballots and shall not be used or otherwise obligated for any other purposes.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 2 provides: “That this act is effective on its passage [September 4, 2020] as provided in §

1-214

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 235, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Elections shall convene a work group to consider and evaluate alternatives to the witness signature requirement for election officials to use to verify that an absentee ballot has been cast by the voter identified as having requested and received the absentee ballot. The work group shall include such persons determined by the Department of Elections as necessary or appropriate. The work group shall organize no later than July 31, 2021, and shall complete its work no later than October 31, 2021. If recommending any specific policies or legislative proposals, the work group, through the Commissioner of Elections, shall communicate such recommendations to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections by November 15, 2021.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 278, designated the existing provisions as subsections A through E; in subsection B, substituted “in subsection A” for “above” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; in subsection C, substituted,
“in subsection A or B” for “above”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and rewrote the section. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 289, substituted “eleventh day” for “seventh day” in subsection B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 235, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471 and 522, effective July 1, 2021, are nearly identical, and added the subsection A and C designations; in the second paragraph of subsection A, deleted “and mail it to the office of the general registrar or deliver it personally to the general registrar” at the end of clause (e), and deleted the former last sentence, which read “For purposes of this chapter, ‘mail’ shall include delivery by a commercial delivery service, but shall not include delivery by a personal courier service or another individual except as provided by §§

24.2-703.2

and

24.2-705

”; inserted subsection B.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Absentee ballots. —

The provisions of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, specifically 42 U.S.C.A. § 1971(a)(2)(B), does not conflict with the specific requirement of completion of the voter statement required by §

24.2-706

and would not preempt the Commonwealth from requiring such a statement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jean R. Jensen, Secretary, State Board of Elections, 05-050 (8/1/05).

The State Board of Elections has the authority to adopt standards and instructions for use by local election officials in determining what constitutes an error or omission in completion of the voter statement that is not material in determining whether an individual is qualified to vote in an election. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jean R. Jensen, Secretary, State Board of Elections, 05-050 (8/1/05).

Death of absentee voter prior to election. —

When a general registrar knows that an absentee voter has died prior to election day, but after having voted by absentee ballot, the registrar must cancel that voter’s registration, and the absentee ballot should not be counted; but when absentee ballots are cast prior to election day in a manner by which the absentee ballot no longer can be set aside, the general registrar who knows of the voter’s death shall cancel that voter’s registration, but election officials are not otherwise required to perform the impossible task of not counting the deceased voter’s absentee ballot. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Robin R. Lind, Secretary, Goochland County Electoral Board, 10-104, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 71 (10/26/10).

Overseas military voters. —

Virginia law does not require an overseas military voter submitting a Virginia absentee ballot pursuant to the procedure contained in this section to include the printed name and address of the person who signs the witness statement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable W.R. “Bill” Janis, Member, House of Delegates 08-088 (10/27/08).

§ 24.2-707.1.
Drop-off locations for return of absentee ballots.

The general registrar of each county or city shall establish at the office of the general registrar and each voter satellite office in operation for an election a drop-off location for the purpose of allowing the deposit of completed absentee ballots for such election. On the day of the election, there shall also be a drop-off location at each polling place in operation for the election. The general registrar may establish additional drop-off locations within the county or city as he deems necessary. All drop-off locations shall be accessible; be on public property, unless located at a polling place; and otherwise comply with any criteria for drop-off locations set by the Department.

The Department shall set standards for the establishment and operation of drop-off locations, including necessary security requirements. The Department shall submit such standards annually by October 1 to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the House Committee on Appropriations.

Not later than 55 days prior to any election, the general registrar shall post notice of the sites of the drop-off locations in the locality in the office of the general registrar and on the official website of the county or city. Such notice shall remain in the office of the general registrar and on the official website of the county or city for the duration of the period during which absentee ballots may be returned.

Absentee ballots shall be collected from drop-off locations in accordance with the instructions provided by the Department. Such instructions shall include chain of custody requirements and recordkeeping requirements. Absentee ballots shall be collected at least daily by (i) two officers of election or electoral board members representing the two major political parties where practicable or (ii) two employees from the office of the general registrar, unless the drop-off location is in the office of the general registrar, in which case the general registrar or a deputy general registrar may collect the absentee ballots.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471, 522; 2022, c. 140.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 522, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Elections shall convene a work group to consider and evaluate methods for sorting absentee ballots by the precinct of the voter casting the absentee ballot and reporting vote totals from absentee ballots separately by each precinct. The work group shall include such persons determined by the Department of Elections as necessary or appropriate. The work group shall organize no later than July 31, 2021, and shall complete its work no later than October 31, 2021. If recommending any specific policies or legislative proposals, the work group, through the Commissioner of Elections, shall communicate such recommendations to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections by November 15, 2021.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “a deputy” for “an assistant” in subsection D.

§ 24.2-708.
Return of unused ballots; voting by applicant who did not receive or lost ballot; defaced ballots.

Any person who has applied for and received an absentee ballot may choose not to vote absentee and shall be entitled to cast a ballot in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

The voter may, prior to the day of the election, return the ballot to the general registrar (i) unopened in the sealed envelope in which it was sent to him or (ii) opened and unmarked.The general registrar shall note on the voter’s record, opposite the name of the voter, the fact that the ballot was returned unused and the date of the return and shall carefully preserve the ballot with all ballots returned unused. Such ballots shall be delivered, with other returned ballots, to the officers of election on election day. The voter shall then be entitled to vote a regular ballot in the office of the general registrar, or he may choose to vote at his proper polling place or at a central absentee voter precinct on the day of the election. On the day of the election, (a) if the general registrar or an officer of election is able to confirm the return of the unused ballot, the voter shall be entitled to vote a regular ballot and (b) if the general registrar or an officer of election is unable to confirm the return of the unused ballot, the voter shall be entitled to cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

.

The voter may, on the day of the election, return his unused ballot to his proper polling place or central absentee voter precinct, and the unused ballot shall be preserved with other unused ballots. The voter shall then be entitled to vote a regular ballot.

The voter may, on the day of the election, offer to vote at his proper polling place or at a central absentee voter precinct without returning his unused ballot, and he shall be entitled to cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

.

Any person who has applied for and has been sent an absentee ballot but does not receive the ballot or loses the ballot shall be entitled to cast a ballot in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

The voter may, prior to the day of the election, present to the general registrar or officer of election a statement signed by him that he did not receive the ballot or has lost the ballot. Such statement shall be made subject to felony penalties for making false statements as pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, and the voter shall then be entitled to cast a regular ballot.

The voter may, on the day of the election, offer to vote at his proper polling place or at a central absentee voter precinct, and he shall be entitled to cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

.

Any person who has applied for and has been sent an absentee ballot that has been unintentionally or accidentally defaced and rendered unfit for voting shall be entitled to cast a ballot in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

The voter may, prior to the day of the election, present the defaced ballot to the general registrar or an officer of election, and the ballot shall be marked spoiled by the general registrar or an officer of election and placed in a spoiled-ballot envelope to be retained with the ballots for the election. The voter shall then be entitled to vote a regular ballot in the office of the general registrar, or he may choose to vote at his proper polling place or at a central absentee voter precinct on the day of the election. On the day of the election, (i) if the general registrar or an officer of election is able to confirm the return of the defaced ballot, the voter shall be entitled to vote a regular ballot and (ii) if the general registrar or an officer of election is unable to confirm the return of the defaced ballot, the voter shall be entitled to cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

.

The voter may, on the day of the election, present his defaced or unfit ballot to his proper polling place or central absentee voter precinct, and the defaced or unfit ballot shall be preserved with other spoiled ballots. The voter shall then be entitled to vote a regular ballot.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-336, 24-340.1; 1954, c. 511; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-233; 1974, c. 428; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 725; 2006, c. 283; 2010, c. 348; 2012, c. 645; 2014, c. 600; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 471.

The 1999 amendment,

in the third paragraph, inserted “or loses the ballot” and inserted “or has lost the ballot,” and added the last paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 283 added the last sentence in the third paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 348 inserted subsection A through C designations; substituted “proper polling place or at a central absentee voter precinct established by the governing body of the county or city where the person is registered to vote” for “precinct” in the last sentence of the last paragraph of subsection A; inserted “or at a central absentee voter precinct established by the governing body of the county or city where he is registered to vote” in the last sentence of subsection B; and inserted the last sentence in subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 645, in the second paragraph of subsection A, deleted commas following “A voter” and “provided herein” and substituted “a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

” for “his vote” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence; and in subsection C, substituted “a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

” for “his vote” in the third sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 600 in the first paragraph of subsection A inserted “or the general registrar,” and made a stylistic change; in the second paragraph of subsection A inserted “before the day of the election” and “upon confirmation by the electoral board, the general registrar, or an officer of election of the return of the used ballot,” substituted “vote a regular ballot” for “cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

,” “If the electoral board, the general registrar, or an officer of election is unable to confirm the return of the unused ballot, the voter shall be entitled to cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653.1

. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a” for “However, a,” and “may return” for “who returns,” and made a stylistic change; and in subsection C inserted “the general” twice, “before the day of the election,” “upon confirmation by the electoral board, the general registrar, or an officer of election of the return of the defaced ballot,” substituted “vote a regular ballot” for “cast a provisional ballot pursuant to § 24.2-653.1” and “A” for “However, a,” added the fourth sentence, and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and, in subsection A, deleted “electoral board or the” preceding “general registrar” in the first paragraph, deleted “electoral board, the” preceding “general registrar” in the third and fourth sentences of the second paragraph and made related stylistic changes, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the first and second sentences of the second paragraph; substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the first sentence of subsection B; and deleted “electoral board, the” preceding “general registrar” everywhere it appears in subsection C and made related stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 471, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-709.
Ballot to be returned in manner prescribed by law.

Any ballot returned to the office of the general registrar or to a drop-off location in any manner except as prescribed by law shall be void. Absentee ballots shall be returned to the general registrar or to a drop-off location before the closing of the polls. Any voter who is in line to return an absentee ballot at a drop-off location by 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election shall be permitted to deposit his absentee ballot. The registrar receiving the ballot shall (i) seal the ballot in an envelope with the statement or declaration of the voter, or both, attached to the outside and (ii) mark on each envelope the date, time, and manner of delivery. No returned absentee ballot shall be deemed void because (a) the inner envelope containing the voted ballot is imperfectly sealed so long as the outside envelope containing the ballot envelope is sealed or (b) it is not returned sealed in the outside envelope so long as it is returned sealed in the inner envelope.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, any absentee ballot (i) returned to the general registrar after the closing of the polls on election day but before noon on the third day after the election and (ii) postmarked on or before the date of the election shall be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in this chapter if the voter is found entitled to vote. For purposes of this subsection, a postmark shall include any other official indicia of confirmation of mailing by the United States Postal Service or other postal or delivery service.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, any absentee ballot (i) received after the close of the polls on any election day, (ii) received before 5:00 p.m. on the second business day before the State Board meets to ascertain the results of the election pursuant to this title, (iii) requested on or before but not sent by the deadline for making absentee ballots available under §

24.2-612

, and (iv) cast by a covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

, shall be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in this chapter if the voter is found entitled to vote. The electoral board shall prepare an amended certified abstract, which shall include the results of such ballots, and shall deliver such abstract to the State Board by the business day prior to its meeting pursuant to this title, and shall deliver a copy of such abstract to the general registrar to be available for inspection when his office is open for business.

Notwithstanding the provisions of clause (i) of subsection B of §

24.2-427

, an absentee ballot returned by a voter in compliance with §

24.2-707

and this section who dies prior to the counting of absentee ballots on election day shall be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in this chapter if the voter is found to have been entitled to vote at the time that he returned the ballot.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-328; 1956, c. 525; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-230; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1975, c. 515; 1993, c. 641; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2006, c. 297; 2010, cc. 449, 645; 2011, c. 654; 2012, c. 353; 2014, c. 580; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 288, 933, 1149, 1151, 1201; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471, 522.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and inserted the present second sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 297 deleted “in time to be delivered to the officers of election” preceding “before the closing” in the second sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and designated the existing provisions as subsection A and added subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 654 added subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 353 inserted “(i) seal the ballot in an envelope with the statement or declaration of the voter, or both, attached to the outside and (ii)” in the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 580 in subsection A added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “electoral board or” preceding “general registrar” in the first and second sentences, deleted “board member or” preceding “registrar” in the third sentence, and deleted the fourth sentence, which read: “For all ballots returned by the general registrar to the electoral board, the board shall give to the general registrar a receipt showing the time and date of the return.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” for “subdivision 2 of §

24.2-700

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 288 and 933 are identical, and added subsection B and redesignated remaining subsections; in subsection C, substituted “any absentee ballot” for “absentee ballots,” deleted “and” following “in this chapter,” deleted “included in the election returns” at the end of the first sentence and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, in subsection B in the first sentence, substituted “any absentee ballot” for “absentee ballots” in the introductory language, and rewrote clause (iv), which read “(iv) cast by an absentee voter who is eligible for an absentee ballot under subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

shall be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in this chapter and, if the voter is found entitled to vote, included in the election returns.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471 and 522, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “or to a drop-off location” in the first and second sentences, inserted the third sentence, inserted the clause (a) designation, and added “or (b) it is not returned sealed in the outside envelope so long as it is returned sealed in the inner envelope.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

For Article, “Lessons from Improvements in Military and Overseas Voting,” 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 833 (2013).